Utah statutes.
26-18-502.   Purpose -- Medicaid certification of nursing care facilities.
(1)  The Legislature finds:
(a)  that an oversupply of nursing care facility programs in the state
adversely affects the state Medicaid program and the health of the people in
the state; and
(b)  it is in the best interest of the state to prohibit Medicaid
certification of nursing care facility programs, except as authorized by this
part.
(2)  Medicaid reimbursement of nursing care facility programs is limited to:
(a)  the number of nursing care facility programs with Medicaid certification
as of May 4, 2004; and
(b)  additional nursing care facility programs approved for Medicaid
certification under the provisions of Subsection 26-18-503(5).
(3)  The division shall not:
(a)  except as authorized by Section 26-18-503:
(i)  process initial applications for Medicaid certification or execute
provider agreements with nursing care facility programs; or
(ii)  reinstate Medicaid certification for a nursing care facility whose
certification expired or was terminated by action of the federal or state
government; or
(b)  execute a Medicaid provider agreement with a certified program that moves
its nursing care facility program to a different physical facility, except as
authorized by Subsection 26-18-503(3).
